Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
431N]

STATE
HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM ACT

Section

431N-1 Findings and purpose

431N-2 Definitions

431N-3 State health insurance program established

431N-4 Transfer of funds

431N-5 Rulemaking authority

431N-6 Reporting, continued funding

431N-7 Violation, penalty

431N-8 Severability

Cross References

Federally qualified health centers; rural health clinics;
reimbursement, see §346-53.6.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next